Ohio, session 136, SB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. The 136th General Assembly declares its intent 4
to enact legislation to reform the law governing the Public 5
Employees Retirement System, School Employees Retirement System, 6
State Teachers Retirement System, Ohio Police & Fire Pension 7
Fund, and State Highway Patrol Retirement System. This 8
legislation will make necessary changes to the law to ensure the 9
health and sustainability of the state's public retirement 10
systems. 11